Idaho, session 2025, H0207.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 46, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 9, Title 46, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 9
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES ACT
46-906. RECOGNITION OF EMS PERSONNEL LICENSURE INTERSTATE COMPACT
(REPLICA). The recognition of EMS personnel licensure interstate compact
(REPLICA) is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other juris-
dictions legally joining therein, in the form substantially as follows:
SECTION I
PURPOSE


In order to protect the public through verification of competency and
ensure accountability for patient care-related activities, all states li-
cense emergency medical services (EMS) personnel, such as emergency medi-
cal technicians (EMTs), advanced EMTs and paramedics. This compact is in-
tended to facilitate the day-to-day movement of EMS personnel across state
boundaries in the performance of their EMS duties as assigned by an appro-
priate authority and authorize state EMS offices to afford immediate legal
recognition to EMS personnel licensed in a member state. This compact rec-
ognizes that states have a vested interest in protecting the public's health
and safety through their licensing and regulation of EMS personnel and that
such state regulation shared among the member states will best protect pub-
lic health and safety. This compact is designed to achieve the following
purposes and objectives:
(1) Increase public access to EMS personnel;
(2) Enhance the states' ability to protect the public's health and
safety, especially patient safety;
(3) Encourage the cooperation of member states in the areas of EMS per-
sonnel licensure and regulation;
(4) Support licensing of military members who are separating from an
active duty tour and their spouses;
(5) Facilitate the exchange of information between member states re-
garding EMS personnel licensure, adverse action and significant investiga-
tory information;
(6) Promote compliance with the laws governing EMS personnel practice
in each member state; and
(7) Invest all member states with the authority to hold EMS personnel
accountable through the mutual recognition of member state licenses.
SECTION II
DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact:
(1) "Advanced emergency medical technician" (AEMT) means an individual
licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds
to that level in the national EMS education standards and national EMS scope
of practice model.
(2) "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or
criminal action permitted by a state's laws that may be imposed against li-
censed EMS personnel by a state EMS authority or state court, including but
not limited to actions against an individual's license such as revocation,
suspension, probation, consent agreement, monitoring or other limitation
or encumbrance on the individual's practice, letters of reprimand or ad-
monition, fines, criminal convictions and state court judgments enforcing
adverse actions by the state EMS authority.
(3) "Alternative program" means a voluntary, nondisciplinary sub-
stance abuse recovery program approved by a state EMS authority.
(4) "Certification" means the successful verification of entry-level
cognitive and psychomotor competency using a reliable, validated and
legally defensible examination.


(5) "Commission" means the national administrative body of which all
states that have enacted the compact are members.
(6) "Emergency medical technician" (EMT) means an individual licensed
with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds to that
level in the national EMS education standards and national EMS scope of prac-
tice model.
(7) "Home state" means a member state where an individual is licensed to
practice emergency medical services.
(8) "License" means the authorization by a state for an individual to
practice as an EMT, AEMT, paramedic or a level in between EMT and paramedic.
(9) "Medical director" means a physician licensed in a member state who
is accountable for the care delivered by EMS personnel.
(10) "Member state" means a state that has enacted this compact.
(11) "Paramedic" means an individual licensed with cognitive knowledge
and a scope of practice that corresponds to that level in the national EMS
education standards and national EMS scope of practice model.
(12) "Privilege to practice" means an individual's authority to deliver
emergency medical services in remote states as authorized under this com-
pact.
(13) "Remote state" means a member state in which an individual is not
licensed.
(14) "Restricted" means the outcome of an adverse action that limits a
license or the privilege to practice.
(15) "Rule" means a written statement by the commission promulgated
pursuant to section XII of this compact that is of general applicability; im-
plements, interprets or prescribes a policy or provision of the compact; or
is an organizational, procedural or practice requirement of the commission
and has the force and effect of statutory law in a member state and includes
the amendment, repeal or suspension of an existing rule.
(16) "Scope of practice" means defined parameters of various duties or
services that may be provided by an individual with specific credentials.
Whether regulated by rule, statute or court decision, it tends to represent
the limits of services an individual may perform.
(17) "Significant investigatory information" means:
(a) Investigative information that a state EMS authority, after a pre-
liminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity to re-
spond if required by state law, has reason to believe, if proved true,
would result in the imposition of an adverse action on a license or priv-
ilege to practice; or
(b) Investigative information that indicates that the individual rep-
resents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of
whether the individual has been notified and had an opportunity to re-
spond.
(18) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district or territory of
the United States.
(19) "State EMS authority" means the board, office or other agency with
the legislative mandate to license EMS personnel.
SECTION III
HOME STATE LICENSE


(1) Any member state in which an individual holds a current license
shall be deemed a home state for purposes of this compact.
(2) Any member state may require an individual to obtain and retain a
license to be authorized to practice in the member state under circumstances
not authorized by the privilege to practice under the terms of this compact.
(3) A home state's license authorizes an individual to practice in a re-
mote state under the privilege to practice only if the home state:
(a) Currently requires the use of the national registry of emergency
medical technicians (NREMT) examination as a condition of issuing ini-
tial licenses at the EMT and paramedic levels;
(b) Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints
about individuals;
(c) Notifies the commission, in compliance with the terms of this com-
pact, of any adverse action or significant investigatory information
regarding an individual;
(d) No later than five (5) years after activation of the compact, re-
quires a criminal background check of all applicants for initial licen-
sure, including the use of the results of fingerprint or other biometric
data checks compliant with the requirements of the federal bureau of in-
vestigation with the exception of federal employees who have suitabil-
ity determination in accordance with 5 CFR 731.202 and submit documen-
tation of such as promulgated in the rules of the commission; and
(e) Complies with the rules of the commission.
SECTION IV
COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE
(1) Member states shall recognize the privilege to practice of an indi-
vidual licensed in another member state that is in conformance with section
III of this compact.
(2) To exercise the privilege to practice under the terms and provi-
sions of this compact, an individual must:
(a) Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(b) Possess a current unrestricted license in a member state as an EMT,
AEMT, paramedic or state recognized level of licensure with a scope of
practice and authority between EMT and paramedic; and
(c) Practice under the supervision of a medical director.
(3) An individual providing patient care in a remote state under the
privilege to practice shall function within the scope of practice authorized
by the home state unless and until modified by an appropriate authority in
the remote state as may be defined in the rules of the commission.
(4) Except as provided in this section, an individual practicing in a
remote state will be subject to the remote state's authority and laws. A
remote state may, in accordance with due process and that state's laws, re-
strict, suspend or revoke an individual's privilege to practice in the re-
mote state and may take any other necessary actions to protect the health and
safety of its citizens. If a remote state takes action, it shall promptly no-
tify the home state and the commission.
(5) If an individual's license in any home state is restricted or sus-
pended, the individual shall not be eligible to practice in a remote state


under the privilege to practice until the individual's home state license is
restored.
(6) If an individual's privilege to practice in any remote state is
restricted, suspended or revoked, the individual shall not be eligible to
practice in any remote state until the individual's privilege to practice is
restored.
SECTION V
CONDITIONS OF PRACTICE IN A REMOTE STATE
An individual may practice in a remote state under a privilege to prac-
tice only in the performance of the individual's EMS duties as assigned by an
appropriate authority, as defined in the rules of the commission, and under
the following circumstances:
(1) The individual originates a patient transport in a home state and
transports the patient to a remote state;
(2) The individual originates in the home state and enters a remote
state to pick up a patient and provide care and transport of the patient to
the home state;
(3) The individual enters a remote state to provide patient care and/or
transport within that remote state;
(4) The individual enters a remote state to pick up a patient and pro-
vide care and transport to a third member state; and
(5) Other conditions as determined by rules promulgated by the commis-
sion.
SECTION VI
RELATIONSHIP TO EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE COMPACT
Upon a member state's governor's declaration of a state of emergency or
disaster that activates the emergency management assistance compact (EMAC),
all relevant terms and provisions of EMAC shall apply and to the extent any
terms or provisions of this compact conflict with EMAC, the terms of EMAC
shall prevail with respect to any individual practicing in the remote state
in response to such declaration.
SECTION VII
VETERANS, SERVICE MEMBERS SEPARATING FROM ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY, AND THEIR
SPOUSES
(1) Member states shall consider a veteran, active military service
member, and member of the national guard and reserves separating from an
active duty tour, and a spouse thereof, who holds a current valid and unre-
stricted NREMT certification at or above the level of the state license being
sought as satisfying the minimum training and examination requirements for
such licensure.
(2) Member states shall expedite the processing of licensure applica-
tions submitted by veterans, active military service members, and members
of the national guard and reserves separating from an active duty tour, and
their spouses.


(3) All individuals functioning with a privilege to practice under this
section remain subject to the adverse actions provisions of section VIII of
this compact.
SECTION VIII
ADVERSE ACTIONS
(1) A home state shall have exclusive power to impose adverse action
against an individual's license issued by the home state.
(2) If an individual's license in any home state is restricted or sus-
pended, the individual shall not be eligible to practice in a remote state
under the privilege to practice until the individual's home state license is
restored.
(a) All home state adverse action orders shall include a statement that
the individual's compact privileges are inactive. The order may allow
the individual to practice in remote states with prior written autho-
rization from both the home state and remote state's EMS authority.
(b) An individual currently subject to adverse action in the home state
shall not practice in any remote state without prior written authoriza-
tion from both the home state and remote state's EMS authority.
(3) A member state shall report adverse actions and any occurrences
that the individual's compact privileges are restricted, suspended or re-
voked to the commission in accordance with the rules of the commission.
(4) A remote state may take adverse action on an individual's privilege
to practice within that state.
(5) Any member state may take adverse action against an individual's
privilege to practice in that state based on the factual findings of another
member state, as long as each state follows its own procedures for imposing
such adverse action.
(6) A home state's EMS authority shall investigate and take appropriate
action with respect to reported conduct in a remote state as it would if such
conduct had occurred within the home state. In such cases, the home state's
law shall control in determining the appropriate adverse action.
(7) Nothing in this compact shall override a member state's decision
that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse
action and that such participation shall remain nonpublic if required by
the member state's laws. Member states must require individuals who enter
any alternative programs to agree not to practice in any other member state
during the term of the alternative program without prior authorization from
such other member state.
SECTION IX
ADDITIONAL POWERS INVESTED IN A MEMBER STATE'S EMS AUTHORITY
A member state's EMS authority, in addition to any other powers granted
under state law, is authorized under this compact to:
(1) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require
the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence.
Subpoenas issued by a member state's EMS authority for the attendance and
testimony of witnesses, and/or the production of evidence from another mem-


ber state, shall be enforced in the remote state by any court of competent
jurisdiction, according to that court's practice and procedure in consider-
ing subpoenas issued in its own proceedings. The issuing state EMS authority
shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required
by the service statutes of the state where the witnesses and/or evidence are
located; and
(2) Issue cease and desist orders to restrict, suspend or revoke an in-
dividual's privilege to practice in the state.
SECTION X
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR EMS PERSONNEL PRACTICE
(1) The compact states hereby create and establish a joint public
agency known as the interstate commission for EMS personnel practice.
(a) The commission is a body politic and an instrumentality of the com-
pact states.
(b) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commis-
sion shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent ju-
risdiction where the principal office of the commission is located. The
commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent
it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution
proceedings.
(c) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity.
(2) Membership, voting, and meetings.
(a) Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate. The
responsible official of the state EMS authority or such official's de-
signee shall be the delegate to this compact for each member state. Any
delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law
of the state from which the delegate is appointed. Any vacancy occur-
ring in the commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the
member state in which the vacancy exists. In the event that more than
one (1) board, office or other agency with the legislative mandate to
license EMS personnel at and above the level of EMT exists, the governor
of the state will determine which entity will be responsible for assign-
ing the delegate.
(b) Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote with regard to the
promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have
an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commis-
sion. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided
in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates' participation in
meetings by telephone or other means of communication.
(c) The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.
(d) All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meet-
ings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking
provisions in section XII of this compact.
(e) The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the
commission must discuss noncompliance of a member state with its obli-
gations under the compact; the employment, compensation, discipline or


other personnel matters, practices or procedures related to specific
employees or other matters related to the commission's internal person-
nel practices and procedures; current, threatened or reasonably antic-
ipated litigation; negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of
goods, services or real estate; accusing any person of a crime or for-
mally censuring any person; disclosure of trade secrets or commercial
or financial information that is privileged or confidential; disclo-
sure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would consti-
tute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; disclosure of
investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes; disclo-
sure of information related to any investigatory reports prepared by or
on behalf of or for use of the commission or other committee charged with
responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues
pursuant to the compact; or matters specifically exempted from disclo-
sure by federal or member state statute.
(f) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this
provision, the commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify
that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempt-
ing provision. The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly
describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and
accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including
a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in con-
nection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes
and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to
release by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of com-
petent jurisdiction.
(3) The commission shall, by a majority vote of the delegates, pre-
scribe bylaws and/or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or
appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of the compact,
including but not limited to:
(a) Establishing the fiscal year of the commission;
(b) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establish-
ment and meetings of other committees; and governing any general or spe-
cific delegation of any authority or function of the commission;
(c) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meet-
ings of the commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meet-
ings, and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by
interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the
public's interest, the privacy of individuals, and proprietary infor-
mation, including trade secrets. The commission may meet in closed ses-
sion only after a majority of the membership votes to close a meeting in
whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the commission must make pub-
lic a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the vote of each
member with no proxy votes allowed;
(d) Establishing the titles, duties and authority, and reasonable pro-
cedures for the election of the officers of the commission;
(e) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establish-
ment of the personnel policies and programs of the commission. Notwith-
standing any civil service or other similar laws of any member state,


the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs
of the commission;
(f) Promulgating a code of ethics to address permissible and prohibited
activities of commission members and employees;
(g) Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the commis-
sion and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist
after the termination of the compact after the payment and/or reserving
of all of its debts and obligations;
(h) Publishing its bylaws and filing a copy thereof, and a copy of any
amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the
member states, if any;
(i) Maintaining its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
and
(j) Meeting and taking such actions as are consistent with the provi-
sions of this compact and the bylaws.
(4) The commission shall have the following powers:
(a) The authority to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coor-
dinate implementation and administration of this compact. The rules
shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all member
states;
(b) To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of
the commission, provided that the standing of any state EMS authority or
other regulatory body responsible for EMS personnel licensure to sue or
be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(c) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(d) To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel, including
but not limited to employees of a member state;
(e) To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, de-
fine duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out
the purposes of the compact, and to establish the commission's person-
nel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifica-
tions of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
(f) To accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of money,
equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize
and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the commission shall
strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of inter-
est;
(g) To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or
otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal or
mixed; provided that at all times the commission shall strive to avoid
any appearance of impropriety;
(h) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal or mixed;
(i) To establish a budget and make expenditures;
(j) To borrow money;
(k) To appoint committees, including advisory committees comprised of
members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives,
and consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may
be designated in this compact and the bylaws;


(l) To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies;
(m) To adopt and use an official seal; and
(n) To perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate
to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regu-
lation of EMS personnel licensure and practice.
(5) Financing of the commission.
(a) The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the rea-
sonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activ-
ities.
(b) The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources,
donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and ser-
vices.
(c) The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from
each member state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of
the operations and activities of the commission and its staff, which
must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as ap-
proved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The
aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a for-
mula to be determined by the commission, which shall promulgate a rule
binding upon all member states.
(d) The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission
pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the
authority of the member state.
(e) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall
be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its
bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public
accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become
part of the annual report of the commission.
(6) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
(a) The members, officers, executive director, employees and represen-
tatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, ei-
ther personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for dam-
age to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission
that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this
paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit and/or
liability for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the inten-
tional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
(b) The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive direc-
tor, employee or representative of the commission in any civil action
seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employ-
ment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the
claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the


scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided
that nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit that person
from retaining such person's own counsel; and provided further, that
the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from that
person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
(c) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, offi-
cer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission
for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that per-
son arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that oc-
curred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsi-
bilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing oc-
curred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsi-
bilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did
not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
SECTION XI
COORDINATED DATABASE
(1) The commission shall provide for the development and maintenance of
a coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse
action and significant investigatory information on all licensed individu-
als in member states.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a
member state shall submit a uniform data set to the coordinated database on
all individuals to whom this compact is applicable as required by the rules
of the commission, including:
(a) Identifying information;
(b) Licensure data;
(c) Significant investigatory information;
(d) Adverse actions against an individual's license;
(e) An indicator that an individual's privilege to practice is re-
stricted, suspended or revoked;
(f) Nonconfidential information related to alternative program par-
ticipation;
(g) Any denial of application for licensure and the reason(s) for such
denial; and
(h) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this
compact, as determined by the rules of the commission.
(3) The coordinated database administrator shall promptly notify all
member states of any adverse action taken against, or significant investiga-
tive information on, any individual in a member state.
(4) Member states contributing information to the coordinated database
may designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing state.
(5) Any information submitted to the coordinated database that is sub-
sequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member state contribut-
ing the information shall be removed from the coordinated database.
SECTION XII


RULEMAKING
(1) The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules
and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or
amendment.
(2) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a
rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt
the compact, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any mem-
ber state.
(3) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or
special meeting of the commission.
(4) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the
commission, and at least sixty (60) days in advance of the meeting at which
the rule will be considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a no-
tice of proposed rulemaking:
(a) On the website of the commission; and
(b) On the website of each member state EMS authority or the publication
in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.
(5) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
(a) The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the
rule will be considered and voted upon;
(b) The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the
proposed rule;
(c) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested per-
son; and
(d) The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the com-
mission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written
comments.
(6) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow
persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall
be made available to the public.
(7) The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing be-
fore it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by:
(a) At least twenty-five (25) persons;
(b) A governmental subdivision or agency; or
(c) An association having at least twenty-five (25) members.
(8) If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the commis-
sion shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled public hearing.
(a) All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall notify the ex-
ecutive director of the commission or other designated member in writ-
ing of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing not less than
five (5) business days before the scheduled date of the hearing.
(b) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who
wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or
in writing.
(c) No transcript of the hearing is required, unless a written request
for a transcript is made, in which case the person requesting the tran-
script shall bear the cost of producing the transcript. A recording may
be made in lieu of a transcript under the same terms and conditions as


a transcript. This subsection shall not preclude the commission from
making a transcript or recording of the hearing if it so chooses.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate
hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the
commission at hearings required by this section.
(9) Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on
the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the commission shall
consider all written and oral comments received.
(10) The commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final
action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the
rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
(11) If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing by in-
terested parties is received, the commission may proceed with promulgation
of the proposed rule without a public hearing.
(12) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may
consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for
comment, or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided
in the compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule
as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emer-
gency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
(a) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
(b) Prevent a loss of commission or member state funds;
(c) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that
is established by federal law or rule; or
(d) Protect public health and safety.
(13) The commission or an authorized committee of the commission may di-
rect revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of cor-
recting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the
website of the commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be
challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change
to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the chair
of the commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is
made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision
is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the
commission.
SECTION XIII
OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
(1) Oversight.
(a) The executive, legislative and judicial branches of state govern-
ment in each member state shall enforce this compact and take all ac-
tions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact's purposes
and intent. The provisions of this compact and the rules promulgated
hereunder shall have standing as statutory law.
(b) All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules
in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertain-


ing to the subject matter of this compact that may affect the powers, re-
sponsibilities or actions of the commission.
(c) The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any such proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in such a pro-
ceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the
commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission,
this compact, or promulgated rules.
(2) Default, technical assistance, and termination.
(a) If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in
the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this com-
pact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall provide written no-
tice to the defaulting state and other member states of the nature of the
default, the proposed means of curing the default and/or any other ac-
tion to be taken by the commission; and provide remedial training and
specific technical assistance regarding the default.
(b) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
state may be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a
majority of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits
conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of
termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state
of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(c) Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only af-
ter all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice
of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's
legislature, and each of the member states.
(d) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assess-
ments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date
of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective
date of termination.
(e) The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is
found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact, un-
less agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting
state.
(f) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by pe-
titioning the United States district court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices.
The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, in-
cluding reasonable attorney's fees.
(3) Dispute resolution.
(a) Upon request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to re-
solve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and
between member and nonmember states.
(b) The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation
and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(4) Enforcement.
(a) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall
enforce the provisions and rules of this compact.
(b) By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the
United States district court for the District of Columbia or the fed-


eral district where the commission has its principal offices against
a member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of
the compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought
may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
(c) The remedies in this section shall not be the exclusive remedies of
the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available
under federal or state law.
SECTION XIV
DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR EMS PERSONNEL
PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED RULES, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
(1) The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact
statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state. The provisions, which
become effective at that time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the
commission relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter,
the commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary to the
implementation and administration of the compact.
(2) Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the commission's
initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist
on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that
has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the full force and
effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state.
(3) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
(a) A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6)
months after enactment of the repealing statute.
(b) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the with-
drawing state's EMS authority to comply with the investigative and ad-
verse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effec-
tive date of withdrawal.
(4) Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate
or prevent any EMS personnel licensure agreement or other cooperative ar-
rangement between a member state and a nonmember state that does not conflict
with the provisions of this compact.
(5) This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to
this compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until
it is enacted into the laws of all member states.
SECTION XV
CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the pur-
poses thereof. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of
any state member thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect
as to the remaining member states. Nothing in this compact supersedes state
law or rules related to licensure of EMS agencies.


SECTION 2. That Section 56-1013B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 56-1013C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 56-1013D, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 56-1013E, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 56-1013F, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 56-1013G, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 8. That Section 56-1013H, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 9. That Section 56-1013I, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 10. That Section 56-1013J, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 11. That Section 56-1013K, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 12. That Section 56-1013L, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 13. That Section 56-1013M, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 14. That Section 56-1013N, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 15. That Section 56-1013O, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 16. That Section 56-1013P, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 17. That Section 56-1013Q, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 18. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.